Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
Number of Reviews
24

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Kevin Costner
Cast: Kevin Costner, Will Patton, Larenz Tate, Olivia Williams, James
Russo, Daniel von Bargen
Rated PG-13: Violence, sex, language
    It is the year 2013, and a war in 1997 leads to the end of
civilization as we know it. A man named Bethlehem--General
Bethlehem--has become master of the universe, controlling a semi-large
army using tactics similar to those of Hitler's. His day-to-day
activities include roaming the Beautiful countryside and taking supplies
from small villages of people who are obviously at his mercy. Oh yeah,
and before the apocalypse, he was a copy machine salesman.
    One day he makes the mistake of enlisting the Nameless Man, who
subsequently becomes a postman and saves the world and the human race
from the brink of destruction.
    Kevin Costner's The Postman is one of the worst films I've ever
seen. It's a multi-faceted mess; a heinous misfire; a laughable, silly,
pretentious, three-hour waste of life, time, and effort. To see it--to
sit through this film and attentively watch every second as I did--is an
experience that many, if not all, people should have, if for no other
reason than to understand what a terrible film in its purest of states
looks like. It is almost inconceivable to me that this movie was created
by the same man responsible for Dances With Wolves, for The Postman is a
film based on a flawed and ludicrous concept, and takes it to the next
level by adding offbeat humor, unintentional humor, awful direction, and
bad acting. These things alone don't make this film worthless: the movie
is ultimately destroyed by it's own seriousness. It plays almost like a
parody of itself and the genre to which it belongs, but in time we
realize that, dear God, this film thought we cared.
    General Bethlehem, played with fire and charisma by Will Patton, is
a fascinating character. He's not so enticing simply because of his
characteristics on screen, but because of what his presence in the film
does to it as a whole. Patton brings and authentic evil flair to this
unfortunately stock-evil character, but I like the scene in which he
screams, "You want a war! I'll give you . . . a war!" Patton, unlike
Costner, seems to realize this story's potential for satire. He
overacts, true, but it's so fun to watch, and I'm confident that Patton,
who is a great actor, knew what he was doing. Out of all the characters
in this film, he was the only one whose fate I cared about, which is
ironic given the "evil" sign hung around his neck. Although I liked him,
he serves simply to send this film to rock-bottom: his exaggerated
presence is what this film should have been, but he contrasts so sharply
with the rest of this wannabe feel-good slop that that nothing can be
taken seriously.
    Of course, the rest of the film would have still been awful without
him, but it would have been consistent awfulness and a lot more boring.
Nothing feels real in this movie; it is so phony and dead that any
attempt at a moving scene or moment made me laugh out loud. I really
hated the scene in which the Postman (previously referred to as Nameless
Man) flies by a little kid holding up a letter on the road, only to turn
around, stare at the kid for thirty seconds, and then ride back at full
speed and swipe the letter out of the kid's hand. Costner shot this in
slow-motion, no less, and I can't recall a scene that has such an
opposite effect as intended as this one. Scene after scene has this
quality, this good-intentioned garbage that looks fake, feels fake,
screams for attention, but elicits only laughter and snickering.
    The Postman is based on a book, and I wonder how much of this film's
failure is Costner's fault. It's hard to imagine taking this premise
seriously, even if the film had been done well. I, personally, just
think that postmen do their job. Sure, there are probably postmen who
really take pride in their work, but I just can't quite manage the
explosive energy that this film wants me to manifest. Giving mail,
picking up mail, sorting mail--it doesn't get my blood flowing. As if
this weren't enough, the film shoves this down our throats by asking us
to believe that, in the future apocalypses to come, postmen will be the
ones to set us straight. Aside from this, no history of what the hell
happened between 1997 and 2013 is explained, or even hinted to, and that
was the only element of this film that I wanted to know more about.
Everything else is showed in glorious, excessive detail, for Costner
obviously kept every bit of footage in the final cut. The film could
have been half this long.
    Bad acting and bad dialogue usually show up together, but I think
the actors in The Postman are mostly competent. The dialogue, however,
is not. One scene, in which the Postman is spoon-feeding soup to his
love interest because she fell down, is supposed to be moving. Costner,
however, couldn't resist a stab at humor, so she says something that
sounds completely rational, and he says, "You're so weird!" in a really
goofy tone. A lot of people laughed during this scene. I thought it
might have been funny in a different movie, but a film like The Postman
needs to be more careful with its dialogue--the film is overloaded with
verbal colloquialisms. Costner even says, "Bite me!" at one point. Most
of the dialogue, even when it isn't trying to be important, is awful.
    Yes, The Postman is the worst film of 1997. No amount of good
intentions can lift this from its fate. Even the Beautiful scenery and
nice, huge sets became nauseating after I had stared at them for three
hours. Like I said, many should see this film, and many probably will,
but for the wrong reason--you must marvel in the simple fact that
Costner clearly had no idea what he was doing. A hopelessly inane
concept, mixed with the worst possible elements of filmmaking and
acting, make this film an experience that you're unlikely to forget.
View it with awe and wonder, and ask yourself when it's finished, "What
on earth was he thinking?" The answer to that question would be
infinitely more interesting than this film.

Author
Miles Southan
Forget the Little Caesars advertisement with the dancing dog. "The
Postman"  is now the most entertaining commercial I have ever seen. I
didn't know until the credits rolled that I had actually been watching a
movie - I thought it was an ad for the US Postal Service to help clean
their image after all of those disgruntled postal worker controversies.
This truly is a propaganda film. Everyone loves the postal service in
"The Postman," the mail is always on time, and the Postman from the
title is even called a "god send." 
I don't mind being brainwashed if I'm having a good time, and for the
most part, that's what "The Postman" provides. But don't confuse this
flick with the award winning Italian movie "Il Postino" even though
there are similarities. Massimo Troisi, the guy who played Mario in "Il
Postino" refused to have his heart condition fixed until the filming of
"Il Postino" was complete; he died from heart disease one day after
production was finished. "The Postman" is so long (190 minutes) that the
same thing will probably happen to anyone with a heart condition who
goes to see Kevin  Costner's "The Postman" and refuses to have his heart
fixed until after the movie ends! 
Even after the nearly disastrous "WaterWorld," Director Kevin Costner
has enough confidence to direct yet another post-apocalyptic future
movie. He even gives a nod to the unsuccessful "WaterWorld" by having
two characters in "The Postman" discuss a place called "St. Rose," a
possibly mythical haven that is talked about in the same terms that
DryLand was in WaterWorld. What distinguishes "The Postman" is that it
has an especially frightening view of the future. At one point, a town
is established that is made up entirely of postal workers... and they're
armed!! That's even worse than living on a world completely submerged in
water! 
In the world of "The Postman," there is no government, food is scarce,
towns are terrorized by thieves on horseback, et cetera. Of course
things are bad - This is a future movie! Thankfully, the cause of the
woes of earth is  never bluntly stated. There's nothing I hate more than
characters talking about stuff they would  already know ("Remember how
the apocalypse started?" "How could I forgot when China dropped the bomb
on us because we assassinated one of their exchange students?" "Yeah,
and remember how we blew up Canada for selling our secrets to the
Russian government?"). There are hints that perhaps racial problems
caused the deadly conflict. Because of that, I feel that this movie is
more important than "Amistad" - and probably more historically accurate
too! From what the screenplay tells me, here's my take on what happened
- after California passed Proposition 209 banning use of race in hiring,
there was a huge war in America. This is a helpful message - "Do the
Right Thing" and don't nationally abolish affirmative action or most of
us will die! 
And this certainly is a message movie. Another message is that improved
communications will bring peace to the world, and that's terrific, but
this movie never dealt with the problem of countries overseas with
inhabitants who speak foreign languages. That's how these wars get
started - ignorant tourists go on vacation to an unusual place and
irritate the wrong people. Judging from the ending of "The Postman,"
maybe the world wised up and accepted English as the only truly holy
tongue. 
After I heard Kevin Costner's first line, I thought to myself - "This
movie was really good until the characters started talking," because the
visuals are excellent. The dialog sounds very bad and bookish at first,
but it gets less bad. To his credit, Kevin was talking to a mule at the
beginning, so he probably wasn't too concerned with intelligent
conversation. 
You can watch "The Postman" and pay attention only to the surface of it
and still like it, but I wasn't content to do that - I wanted to analyze
all of its metaphorical complexities, complexities that I'm sure it
doesn't know it has. Little does Kevin Costner realize, he has directed
a brilliant satirical political allegory. 
"The Postman" details the ultimate battle between whining big government
liberals and selfish wimpy gun-worshiping libertarians. I guess that
explains the movie's catch phrase: "Similar names. Dissimilar
ideologies." 
The villain in this picture is named, symbolically I guess, Bethlehem.
He represents former libertarian presidential candidate Harry Browne. At
the end, not only does this guy get blocked from the presidential
debates, he's shot in the chest! How do you like near-anarchy now,
Browne?? The problem I had with the ending is that it glossed over the
inevitable huge tax hike when the liberals won. It instead focuses on
the fact that because Bethleham is killed with a gun, Postman uses the
oppurtunity to sign a gun control bill called the "Bethleham Bill,"
which creates a two-week waiting period for firearm purchases. President
Starkie would be proud, Kevie!
Bethlehem is the leader of a "clan" of warriors who go from town to town
and accept handouts because they are feared. They are also constantly
recruiting people for their army, but in such small numbers that I don't
understand why they even bother. Kevin Costner happens to enter a town
just before it is struck by the bandits, and Bethlehem happens to choose
him as one of the new soldiers. 
Bethlehem's army takes Kevin Costner back to their marvelous looking
camp and cooks his mule. It is here that the new soldiers are trained
and Bethlehem demonstrates his devotion to libertarianism, shows off his
love for Shakespeare, and his tendency to punish those who are slow
learners. These are your usual bad guy soldier types, but one thing
makes them different - they hate to watch "Universal Soldier," but love
to watch classics like "The Sound of Music." 
Bethlehem's hero is a farmer turned author/libertarian activist named 
Nathan. Nathan wrote an anti-government book that Bethlehem reads an
obscure quote from. When this book, titled "I Want to Tell You," was
published, it evidently helped Nathan start this whole mess that
destroyed the world. I'll never understand these libertarian farmers.
They want to overthrow the nation's government and destroy every living
creature, yet they STILL want their farm subsidies! In his book, Nathan
states that the government should be abolished and replaced with the
"Rules of 8." If I remember right, those rules are: 1. Obey the head of
the "clan." 2. Mercy is for the weak (That's more of an opinion than a
rule). 3. Punishment is swift. 4. Punishment is death. 5. No food after
midnight. 6. Keep away from water. 7. Stay away from bright light. 8.
Anyone can challenge the head of the "clan." I think a lot of those
rules are a little redundant. I could have condensed them down to six at
most. 
Kevin Costner is named Shakespeare by the libertarians because he was an
actor before the "Really REALLY big war," and as one of the villagers in
the beginning points out, he's Really REALLY bad at acting. Another
thing that  characters like to point out about Kevin is that he's
"funny," but some of the quips he makes that are supposed to make him
Mr. Comedian make me long for Joe Piscapo. 
Kevin escapes from the camp, and not that it's much of a surprise, but
this is another one of those movies where it's impossible to kill the
good guy even with excellent marksmen and unlimited bullets, but it's
easy to kill the bad guys. When Kevin is floating down a river at a
steady speed, bullets splash all around him, but later on when he's
captured by the baddies, he's rescued easily by a gun-toting love
interest. 
Kevin's escape is followed by one of the most unintentionally hilarious
scenes in the movie. It's very cold and Kevin discovers a wrecked car.
He hides inside of it and finds a skeleton wearing a postman's uniform
and holding a bag of mail. He puts the uniform on to stay warm and finds
a lighter near the skeleton. As he strikes the flint, he grunts like a
caveman. "Look, ma! I discovered fire!" 
The next morning, Kevin, soon to be known as Postman, walks to the
Pristine Town of PineView, and is let in the gates because he has a
letter for one of the citizens. The townspeople love him even though the
sheriff is suspicious, and at a dance that night, a woman named Abby
asks him to get her pregnant, because she has a husband who can't
produce a baby because he had a case of the "Bad Mumps." "Bad Mumps"? Is
that the clinical term? Abby explains that she'd rather get pregnant by
a wanderer who wouldn't stick around and make her and her husband
uncomfortable. Unfortunately for her, but fortunately for Postman and
for the plot, her husband is later conveniently killed, paving the way
for a romantic relationship between Postman and Abby. 
In PineView, Postman meets a starry-eyed optimistic youth named Ford
Lincoln Mercury who wants to be a Postman too. He must have seen those
"Be All That You Can Be" commercials. Postman invents an oath and dubs
Ford Lincoln Mercury second postman in command. Ford later organizes a
whole fleet of postmen. 
The thrust of the story is that the country starts to become more
patriotic and nationalistic because of the mail deliveries, and
Bethlehem's tyranny starts being questioned. Bethlehem reveals his
anti-Americanism when he forces Abby's soon to be dead husband to burn
an American flag. Hey Newt! Where's the flag burning Amendment when we
need it? 
The best unintentionally funny part in the movie is the scene where
Postman rides past a sad-faced kid who is holding a letter up in the
air. He rides on for quite a while after that, and the kid says to his
disenheartened mother: "I guess I missed him." But wait! The Postman
must have overheard from nearly a mile away. He stops. He looks behind
him. He turns around, and... he takes off back towards the kid! He was
very far away, but for some reason, he's only a foot away from the kid
after a couple of seconds. And in slow motion, Postman heroically grabs
for the letter still in the air, and takes it from the formerly
sad-faced child. When the scene was played again at the end, I think I
saw written in fine print in the corner of the screen, "paid for by the
Government of the United States of America." 
Soft money will be pouring in to pay for the huge amounts of airtime for
the democrats to show this movie and say - "Do you want the world to
turn into a desert wasteland like in 'The Postman'? Then make the right
choice. Vote Democrat!" But 190 minutes is way too long for an attack
ad, so I imagine they'll cut out all the parts where Kevin is doing his
really bad Shakespeare routine. We can't have our spokesman looking like
a dweeb! 
The only thing conservative about this movie is that it advocates
increased military funding, but only temporarily so that the postmen can
get disgruntled and kill a whole slew of libertarians. In fact, that's
the best scene in the entire movie. After the "Postal Massacre" wherein
the postal workers blast their way to victory against the libertarian
fleet, I was able to appreciate the realism of the movie and the
convincingness of the characters' portrayal of insane postal workers.
Finally the bottled up anger in postal workers is put to constructive
use! 
This movie has everything. One of Kevin Costner's most heroic moments is
when he sees the smoke from Rush Limbaugh's cigar floating from around a
rock, and he shoots him dead without even looking.  There's even a
riddle. Kevin Costner as Postman asks, "How much mail can a dead postman
deliver?" It's a great question, but the filmmakers had the gall not to
answer it. I suppose it was more "artsy" and "gutsy" to leave it up to
our imaginations. 
The key to tricking people into liking bad movies is to get them hooked
in with likeable characters, and I'll admit that I fell for the ploy. To
tolerate this movie you have to forgive it for a lot of detriments, and
I was willing to forgive and let the movie grow on me. 
One thing this movie has going for it is that it's so long, that there
just had to be some good stuff in it, even if it was accidental.
Studios, take note - next time you force a director to cut scenes before
distribution, you're probably requesting the only good scenes to be
taken out! 
Mostly what I admired was the picture's emotional aspects, even if they
are sappy a lot of the time. The battle scenes are pretty standard, and
at the end when Postman is riding around on a horse between two lines of
soldiers, the filmmakers actually used stolen footage from "Dances With
Wolves!" 
I had very mixed feelings while watching "The Postman." I didn't know
whether to cheer or throw up! Overall, I enjoyed the film, but there is
much not to like. There are moments of questionable character
motivation, a silly rescue scene, and really bad lines of dialog
("You're weird"). I probably wouldn't encourage anyone to see this
movie, but I wouldn't try to stop anyone who already wanted to go.
http://library.advanced.org/10015

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1997
U.S. Release Date: 12/25/97 (wide)
Running Length: 2:57
MPAA Classification: PG-13 (Violence, sex, brief nudity, profanity)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Kevin Costner, Will Patton, Larenz Tate, Olivia Williams, 
      James Russo, Tom Petty
Director: Kevin Costner
Producers: Jim Wilson, Steve Tisch, and Kevin Costner
Screenplay: Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland, based on the book by 
      David Brin
Cinematography: Stephen Windon
Music: James Newton Howard
U.S. Distributor: Warner Brothers
     There are two ways that you can look at Kevin Costner's THE POSTMAN 
(not to be confused with the former Oscar contender of the same name, 
starring Massimo Troisi).  The first is that it's a muddled but 
occasionally-brilliant lampoon of epic motion pictures.  The other is 
that it's a horribly written, badly acted miscalculation of ISHTAR-like 
proportions.  If you take THE POSTMAN at face value  that it's a 
straightforward, post-apocalyptic adventure tale, then it could seem 
like one of the worst movies of the year, if not of all time.  However, 
since I laughed so hard during some scenes, I prefer to be a little 
kinder.  Yes, it's a bad movie, but it's not one of the most unbearable 
theatrical experiences of the year.  In fact, if you approach THE 
POSTMAN in the right mood, it's a highly watchable motion picture.
     Admittedly, that's damning with faint praise, but I don't think THE 
POSTMAN is so gut-wrenchingly awful that it deserves *1/2 or less.  With 
all of its rampant jingoism, cliched melodrama, and shameless attempts 
at emotional manipulation, THE POSTMAN could easily be viewed as a 
clever satire of epic adventures.  In fact, there are times when it goes 
so far overboard that I found it virtually impossible to believe that 
director Kevin Costner wasn't winking at us.  Sadly, based in part on 
the film's overall tone and in part on some of the director's comments, 
this doesn't seem to be the case.  Except in certain moments that are 
obviously intended to be humorous, THE POSTMAN is not supposed to be a 
joke.  But intent isn't everything, as fans of campy classics will point 
out.  Regardless of what Costner wanted from the movie, it's still 
possible to enjoy it on a completely different level.
     Of course, the running length is the real drawback.  It's difficult 
to thrill to the dissonant rhythms of an "entertainingly bad" movie that 
threatens to drag for three hours.  At half that length, THE POSTMAN 
might have been worth a recommendation, but, past the two hour mark, all 
of the cheese and corn starts becoming painful.  Plus, a rather 
unfortunate attempt to add a message about consequences brings the movie 
to a grinding halt.  We want to see overblown acts of heroism to go 
along with James Newton Howard's grandiose score and Stephen Windon's 
sweeping camerawork.  Instead, we get a little too much of Kevin Costner 
brooding.  
     This side of a TV commercial, never has the U.S. Mail Service been 
so lauded (I wonder if they paid a heavy product placement fee).  On top 
of that, there's such a cloying dose of patriotism that it's a wonder 
that Warner Brothers has been able to sell the film overseas (of course, 
the foreign markets may view all of the half-baked, pro-American slogans 
as one big joke).  From a marketing standpoint, the only thing THE 
POSTMAN has going for it is the star, and his already-dipping stock is 
likely to take a precipitous tumble after this movie hits screens across 
the world.
     The film opens in 2013 on the Great Salt Flats of Utah.  In the 
aftermath of a cataclysmic world war, the human race has been fragmented 
and scattered.  The government of the United States has collapsed, and 
now anarchy reigns.  Small communities across the remains of the country 
jealously protect what they have by offering tribute to the dictatorial 
General Bethlehem (Will Patton), whose army of bandits and murderers 
controls everything.  Any settlement that defies Bethlehem is quickly 
razed.
     One day, a solitary wanderer (Costner) enters a small town to 
present a one-man Shakespeare show as a means of earning a little food 
and shelter.  General Bethlehem pays a surprise visit to this village 
and the nameless loner is conscripted into the Holnist army.  He is a 
rebellious man, however, and it isn't long before he escapes.  Fleeing 
from search parties, he hides out in an old, broken down mail carrier's 
truck.  Taking the full letterbag and the coat off a skeleton, he 
becomes the Postman.  And, as he travels from town-to-town, speaking 
words of hope about the "Reformed Congress of the United States" and 
giving out letters, his reputation spreads, and Bethlehem determines 
that he's a threat.
     Costner has done everything possible to make this film a crowd-
pleaser.  There are snappy one-liners, a romantic subplot for those who 
crave a little sex, and several manipulative scenes that are designed to 
get audiences to applaud wildly.  Unfortunately, we're too busy laughing 
at all of the bloated silliness to remember to clap.  Take, for example, 
one of the film's most emotional moments:  a slow-motion shot of the 
Postman on horseback snatching a letter out of the hand of an eager boy.  
The brief sequence is filmed with such solemnity that it's all-but-
impossible not to be amused, however briefly.  
     Costner plays the Postman like a combination of John Dunbar from 
DANCES WITH WOLVES and the mariner from WATERWORLD.  It's not a 
particularly energetic or interesting performance, and it's made even 
more tiresome by the hero's reluctance to act decisively (this wastes a 
good forty-five minutes).  As the villain, Will Patton is generic.  He's 
neither good nor bad, and doesn't bring much more to the part than we'd 
get from a Dennis Hopper or a Gary Busey.  Larenz Tate's character, Ford 
Lincoln Mercury, is the stereotypical idealistic enthusiast, and Tate 
puts about as much energy into the role as it deserves.  The only 
legitimate spark is generated by newcomer Olivia Williams, who plays 
Abby, the Postman's love interest.  She's quite good, and manages to 
develop an independent female character who's not always in need of 
rescuing, but her above-average effort is wasted in this material.
     It's hard to believe that the same man who directed a modern 
classic, DANCES WITH WOLVES, could be responsible for something this 
horribly mishandled.  Where did it all go wrong?  Probably at the very 
beginning.  THE POSTMAN is a bad idea, poorly executed.  The plot is 
dumb and riddled with gaping holes of logic, and the dialogue sounds 
like it was penned by a hack writer.  (One classic line:  Abby, 
addressing the Postman, says in a heartfelt voice, "You give out hope 
like it was candy in your pocket."  Puhleeze!  Give me a break!)  When 
all is said and done, however, at least it can amuse us.  And, even at 
an interminable three hours, it still offers more solid laughs than half 
of this year's so-called "comedies."
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
Bill Chambers
THE POSTMAN *1/2 (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers, wchamber@netcom.ca
(Now with TRIVIA; film, DVD, LD reviews; a section where YOU can
recommend movies;
fabric softener; and much more!
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers
New address. New attitude. Same crappy writing.)
I'll bet right now you're just lounging by the pool, humming "I Will
Always Love You" and
wistfully recalling your candlelight dinners with success. It isn't
necessarily over for you: I
say you still have enough charm that you could avoid starring in
"Kevin!" for at least a few
more years. Begin by scribbling "the star that burns twice as bright
burns half as long"
somewhere you'll always see it, perhaps on the fridge door, or on a
bedroom mirror with
lipstick. You had a heck of a thing going there until you agreed to star
in Robin Hood: Prince of
Thieves, where you were not only upstaged by powerhouses Morgan Freeman
and Alan
Rickman, but Christian Slater (!), several dozen tall trees, bows,
arrows, and a canoe, too.
After Dances With Wolves and JFK, you decided the world needed more
three hour movies,
expensive three hour movies, so you starred in and produced Wyatt Earp;
Wyatt Earp the
man was a boring idiot who made the history books solely due to a
general lack of famous
Wyatts. Wyatt Earp was so dull a cowboy that he died of natural causes.
Tombstone was a
vastly superior movie based on the same legend, and that featured Kurt
Russell as Earp and
Dana Delaney as his girlfriend! (She was played by Joanna Going in your
movie-you know,
the character known best in Wyatt Earp as "Jew Whore". What were you and
Lawrence
Kasdan thinking?)
Now, you're suffering the demise of yet another of your epics, The
Postman, a film so
financially disastrous that it all but eradicated the memory
Waterworld's and Tin Cup's
mildly lucrative box office takes. The Postman is not the worst movie
ever made-people in
Hollywood are quick to forget movies like Howard the Duck whenever the
next bomb comes
along. Yet it is a ridiculous movie. I suspect you thought you had
another Braveheart on your
hands-why else line up two armies on horesback, all prepared for battle,
for the climax of
your film?-but "Mailheart" The Postman is not. (I can think of some more
appropriate
alternate titles: Post Encounters of the Worst Kind; Farewell, My
Salary; Howard the
Postman; The Postman's Never Watched Twice...)
What a brown movie. I hate brown. You love brown. Dances With Wolves was
golden and
brown-it looked like an Eggo commercial. The Postman had me running for
a glass of water
every two minutes; would the post-apocalyptic world look this
maddeningly bland and dry?
What exactly happened to this desert world, anyway? Did we all become so
stupid that we
didn't immediately begin rebuilding homes, restaurants, and most
importantly, shopping
malls, after "the war"? Why did you choose to drive the movie's plot
with a dumb group of
terrorists who, well, terrorize townfolk across America? Why is it only
*they* have ammunition,
anyway? Was it really appropriate to cast your DAUGHTER as a girl who
has a sweet crush
on you, the drifter-cum-postman? Why cast English actress Olivia
Williams as an American?
Don't you realize that European women can only deliver their big
emotional scenes in their
native accent? (Take a look at the less-than-stellar performances of an
American-ized Nicole
Kidman or an American-ized Minnie Driver.) Who could give a damn whether
you lived or
died at the end of this movie? If it came down to a fight for leadership
between you and the
leader of the terrorists, why didn't you do that halfway through the
film and save us all a lot
of headaches? Why cast Will Patton as the bad guy? Because you worked
with him in No Way
Out? Sure, he's a suitably creepy villain; know why? Because he's creepy
in everything,
including Armageddon, in which he plays a heroic astronaut who
practically slithers into his
space suit! Why heroize the most demonic institution in America, the
U.S. Postal System? Was
Tom Petty supposed to be playing Tom Petty? If so, why didn't he look
more skeletal? (He
should have been around 70 years old.) Why, oh why, do I have so many
questions? (I could
ask plenty more.) Shouldn't a three hour running time have provided you
enough space to
answer everything?
You have one great line in this film, and you deliver it to a mule!:
"The things I like about my
ass..." I had to wonder. Actually, I enjoyed the tone of the opening
scenes, a relaxed cynicism,
if you'll accept such clunky phrasing-too bad you couldn't resist the
temptation to film yet
another love letter to your country.
Ultimately, I'm saying relax. There is no quota, no need for you to make
a picture a year.
Settle down. Really question future screenplays before you commit to
them.
Feel free to write back. I know how much you like letters.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Kevin Costner; Will Patton; Larenz Tate; Olivia Williams & James
Russo
The Postman is Kevin Costner's much-maligned movie that seems to always be
mentioned in the same breath as his other much-maligned movie, Waterworld.
While Waterworld deserved much of the criticism that it received, I think
that most people where a little bit too harsh on The Postman. By biggest
complaint with this movie was that it was a bit long. Other than that, it
really wasn't half bad. Sure, maybe it was a bit self-indulgent on Costner's
part, but self-indulgence is nothing new in Hollywood.
The Postman is set in the Pacific Northwest region of the United States,
specifically Oregon. It is several years into the future and there has been
a civil war in the US, and the government is now in ruins. The man with the
power in this part of the country is General Bethlehem (Will Patton). He
maintains his power through fear and with the help of his somewhat ragtag
army. Kevin Costner plays a down on his luck actor who stumbles across the
dead body of a US postal carrier whose body had been there from the time of
the war. Costner assumes the identity of the postal carrier in the hopes
that he might be able to weasel some food out of one of the local
communities. The locals buy his story that he is a postman and a
representative of the newly restored US government. In fact, he is so
convincing that he inadvertently inspires a whole legion of postal carriers
who work for the newly restored US government. The fact that there is no
newly restored government is something that none of these postal carriers
ever seem to figure out. Anyway, these new representatives of the US
government pose a threat to the power of General Bethlehem, so he decides
that they should be eliminated. The rest of the movie follows how Costner's
character goes from being a con man to believing in the hope that has sprung
from his lies.
The Postman is a bit hokey in places, but for the most part, it works quite
well. By the end of the movie I even started to like Costner's character. I
never really disliked him; I just didn't care about him in the least. Lorenz
Tate gives a great performance as Ford Lincoln Mercury (named after the
ruins of a local car dealership), the young man who is the first to be
inspired by the postman. It is he who later inspires Costner's postman.
Olivia Williams plays Costner's love interest in this movie. For the most
part, this really didn't work for me. Although by the end of the movie I was
actually starting to root for the two of them. For me, the man who really
made this movie was Will Patton as the evil general. Costner fans might
recognize him as the bad guy in one of Costner's earlier films, No Way Out.
Patton gave the best performance of the movie, and his character was, by
far, the most interesting. Other cute casting touches included Tom Petty as
a guy who used to be famous before the war. And while it was fun to see Tom,
and his performance was pretty good, I wouldn't recommend him for the lead
in a Shakespearean drama anytime soon.
My main criticism of The Postman is that it could have stood a little more
time in the editing room. I'd hazard a guess and say that a half an hour
could have easily been cut from this film. The result would have made for a
significantly more enjoyable experience. But if you don't mind long movies
(especially ones with lags in the action) and a little self-indulgence on
the part of a Hollywood heavy hitter, The Postman isn't all that bad. My
only hope is that the next time Costner decides to make one of his epics
that the studio makes him keep it to a manageable length.

Author
Andy Wright
Deserves Recognition for: Achieving the near-impossible task of making a 
grander monument to self-love than Steven Seagal's On Deadly Ground.
Capsule Review:
A question: After the floating Baby Ruth that was WATERWORLD, what in 
the @$&% were the Hollywood execs who gave Kevin Costner the money to 
make another post-apocalyptic movie thinking? In this 3 hour 
advertisement for his new hair weave, Costner plays a nameless drifter 
who dons a long dead Postal employee's uniform and gradually turns a 
nuked-out USA into an idealized hippy-dippy society. (Judging by the 
costuming at the end of the movie, the main accomplishment of this brave 
new world is in re-inventing polyester.) When he's not pointing the 
camera directly at himself, director Costner does have a nice visual 
sense, and it is undeniably fascinating to see such an unabashedly 
jingoistic film in the trust-no-one 90's; but by the time the second 
hour rolled around, I was reduced to sitting on my hands to keep from 
clawing out my own eyes. Mark this one "Return to Sender".
Copyright 1998 by The Critic formerly known as Andrew Wright
For more insanely biased reviews, check out http://www.seanet.com/~louk/
e-mail louk@seanet.com

Author
Walter Frith
     Cynics were already taking shots at director/star Kevin Costner's film
'The Postman' as it was in production and dubbed it 'Dirtworld', mocking it
in reference to Costner's terrible and empty 1995 film 'Waterworld' about
the Earth consumed by melting glaciers eventually flooding most of the
planet.  That film was very unusual, especially showing the characters with
soiled clothes and faces in a world full of water?  In reality, 'The
Postman' is a rich and diversely entertaining film with a thunderous
frontier charge reminiscent of Costner's Oscar-winning 'Dances With Wolves'
from 1990.  Can comparisons be made to 'Dances With Wolves' and 'Waterworld'
when describing 'The Postman'?  Yes.  In fairness, 'The Postman' should be
judged on its own merit and it has plenty of it.
     Based on the award winning science fiction novel by David Brin, 'The
Postman' takes places in the year 2013 when the combination of a deadly
plague and war have ravaged and 
destroyed the fabric of the United States turning the clock back a couple of
centuries to the days of the pioneers.  
     Costner is a lone drifter traveling with his mule named Bill and the
two of them stop at small towns and perform humourous antics for the folks
of the community.  At one 
encounter, Costner meets General Bethlehem (Will Patton), a brutal and
Hitler-like leader who even likes to paint like Hitler did and has taken it
upon himself to be the new leader of the former United States and has an
army of goons who follow him dressed in militia-like outfits for the purpose
of inflicting brutality.
     General Bethlehem demands all men between the ages of 15 and 50 be
turned over to him for the purpose of indoctrination into his army and
Costner is a reluctant subject taken in a prisoner-like manner and
eventually escapes and makes his way to another community.  Before doing so
he finds an abandoned U.S. postal service truck lost in the forest where the
skeleton of a postman still in uniform remains and a bag of mail is in his
possession.  Costner takes the uniform and mail to the new community where
he begins to build hope for the future and re-establishes the mail service
and the days and historical references of the Pony Express are invoked.
     Costner meets a beautiful young woman (Olivia Williams) who along with
her husband asks him to father their child since her husband is infertile
after he contracts a virus.  Costner finally agrees after some very friendly
persuasion.  He also builds a loyal army of men and women who agree to be
postal carriers to face and abolish the naked aggression of General Bethlehem.
     I was overwhelmed by the beautiful scenery of 'The Postman' as it uses
the landscape of U.S. states such as Arizona and Oregon in its filming.  The
characters are well developed and the emotion is brought through in
Costner's ability to use an old fashioned subject and present it from a
different angle in a convincing and powerful manner.  
     The film's climax is tastefully presented as things are resolved with a
restrained amount of bloodshed for a film about war and a conclusion for
which many critics are 
accusing Costner of taking an ego trip.  Just because a director chooses to
tell a story with himself in the lead, doesn't mean he's on an ego trip.  No
one complained when 
Costner did it in 'Dances With Wolves' and people have rarely accused Clint
Eastwood of the same practice although he directs himself as the hero time
and time again.
     At a running time of 2 hours and 57 minutes, 'The Postman' is an epic
story of hope, renewal and is a pure visual presentation of conflict in
which a hero is built in 
a most unusual fashion both convincingly and in a way that makes you feel
good when you leave the theatre.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Laurie D. T. Mann
I really wanted to like this movie.  I loved the original David
Brin novella, which was written in the early '80, and even Brin
himself has said that the shooting version of the script 
wasn't too bad.  The Postman was one of the most frustrating movies 
I've ever seen.  Parts of it are close-to-brilliant, but it's
terribly bogged down by too much Kevin Costner and by a
very weak editing.
There are times, especially early in the film, when "too
much Kevin Costner" is very appropriate.  The opening shots
of Costner wandering in a desert wasteland and being overjoyed
when he comes across an ancient 76 gas station to plunder
is a fine bit of moviemaking.  Setting up the lead as
a somewhat sympathetic borderline-con-man works well.
These early bits exhibit subdued humor - that you really need
a sense of humor to survive in a post-apocalyptic society.
The movie starts to bog down when Costner is captured by
the Holnists.  Costner, the director, felt it necessary to
hit the viewer over the head by the violence and nastiness 
of the Holnists.  It was frankly unnecessary.  (Yes, it was
necessary to show some of this, and to indicate some of the
pecking order.  However, information conveyed in this sequence
telegraphed the ending 2 1/2 hours before the ending finally happened.)
Once Costner has escaped from the Holnists and stolen the
clothes off the skeleton of a postman, he doesn't immediately
"become" "the postman."  He's taken the mail as a diversion,
and suddenly realizes he can use the mail to talk his way into
getting dinner at a very suspicious town.  That was a good bit,
but catastrophe soon follows the Postman whereever he goes.
Still, he's managed to inspire other survivors to think about
delivering the mail.
One particularly pointless sequence sends the postman and a woman
he's impregnated into the woods for a few months.  While it was
necessary to the plot get him out of the way for a while, just simply
having the occassional narrator say "And he stayed away for a few
months, regaining his strength...." could have covered the situation.
When the postman returns to what's left of civilization, he finds
one of his followers has turned delivering the mail from a hack to
a real service.  The teenager, "Ford Lincoln Mercury," has banded 
together with other people, mostly teenagers, to restart 
communication between the scattered towns.  It's a wonderfully-directed
sequence, in which the postman realizes he's little more than a myth
and it's the kids who are the true believers that things can get better.
Costner's oldest daughter plays "Ponytail," one of the mail carriers,
and she does a great job.
Since things seem to be going well, that must mean the Holnists have
to come over and cause trouble. Massacres ensue and Costner tries to
disband the mail carriers to save their lives.  The film gets even
more muddled here, though there are some amusing sequences up on
a high dam that's become a town ruled by Tom Petty ("Were't you
famous once?" Costner asks).  Finally, Costner leads an army against
the Holnists, and guess what happens?  
In The Postman, it's almost as if different people directed different
aspects of the film. The camera work was generally pretty good and 
the feel of a post-apocalyptic America is fine.  Costner, the director,
keeps  making movies that open strong and ultimately fail.  
I enjoyed most  of Dances With Wolves, but I thought the last half 
hour of the  movie came close to ruining the whole thing for me.  
With The Postman, the directoral problems were much more apparent
much earlier.  I was noting unnecessary scenes as I was watching them.
-- 
Laurie D. T. Mann        ***      lmann@ISPcity-net.com
   (Delete all caps to spam-bust the E-mail address.)
Dead People Server:  http://www.city-net.com/~lmann/dps

Author
Homer Yen
It's funny - ironic really, how we take for granted one of our most
established and tried and true forms of communications.  I'm not
talking about phones or faxes or e-mail.  I'm referring to that great
system that we call the postal service.  In the mid-1800s, the brave
riders of the Pony Express helped to bring the population of the
United States closer together through mail routes that were both long
and treacherous.  A lot can be said of these intrepid riders, these
tireless couriers, these postmen.  We can easily romanticize an era
when the postmen and the delivery of mail helped individuals embrace
an entire nation.
Oddly, there seems to be less of an imagination at work here in Kevin
Costner's epic fable.  Set in the not-so-distant future, after a great
war that has decimated America's infrastructure and dissolved the
American government, survivors are caught in a loose feudal system
where the strong prey on the weak and take the spoils of their
victory.  Will Patton plays the evil warlord.  As General Bethlehem,
he leads his army, raids towns and demands tribute in the form of
goods and men, whom he will train to become soldiers under his
command.  Costner, after being unwillingly conscripted into
Bethlehem's army, soon escapes, stumbles upon a mail truck, and
devises a plan to ensure that he survives as he continues to drift
from town to town.  Using his flimsy Shakespearean acting background,
he conjures a fictional tale of how the US government has been
restored, and how he is delivering the mail.  The first town that he
comes upon embraces him.  "You're a Godsend," says an old woman.  Amid
the ruins of civilization, the Postman takes on a symbol of hope and
renewal, something so desperately needed to counterbalance the tyranny
unleashed by Gen. Bethlehem.
Although the Postman is just an act, it touches, in particular, Ford
Lincoln Mercury (Lorenz Tate) who wants to help usher in a new era of
hope by being a Postman as well.   His presence also attracts towngirl
Abby (Olivia Adams).  Through the rest of the movie, the legacy of the
Postman grows, primarily through the efforts of FLM.  The wandering
Costner frequently tells townspeople that "things are getting better
all the time," but is really only interested in a free meal.  However,
the growing illusion of a restored United States not only begins to
slowly move Costner's eccentric and loner character, but also
threatens the viability of Bethlehem's feudal principles.  Bethlehem
wants the Postman dead and mercilessly tries to hunt him down.
The biggest problem with The Postman is that it brings to us another
chapter of a loner who allies himself with a loose band of people
that, against overwhelming odds, must defeat the enemies that
symbolize oppression.  We saw this eloquently done in the superior
Dances With Wolves, and once again in Waterworld.  The Postman doesn't
stack up to either of these two.  There are some good scenes that
epitomize the slim threads of hope that the townspeople have.  For
example, just before men are brutally murdered in a firing line for
not disclosing the whereabouts of Costner, one of them, who has always
been cynical of Costner's intent, shouts, "Ride, Postman, ride!"  
But this is a 3-hour marathon that doesn't give us enough to believe
in to sustain our attention for so long a period of time.  There are
shots of the post-apocalyptic wilderness; there is a slowly developing
bond between Costner and Abby, who turns out to be a strong
frontierswoman; and there are lots of scenes where Costner stares out
into the horizon (probably thinking to himself that this is really a
long movie).  The final confrontation between the Postman and
Bethlehem has 2nd Class stamped all over it.   Throughout the movie,
there seemed to be many times when greatness was just aching to come
out, but ultimately the story was not nearly as rich (or as short) as
it could have been.  I give credit to the filmmakers for trying to
give us something deep and moving.  Unfortunately, the Postman left me
feeling a little disgruntled.

Author
Gordon Hamachi
After seeing The Postman myself, I have a hard time understanding why
the critics have been so savage with it.  While not brilliant, The
Postman is a good, solid work with some brilliant moments.
After being led to believe that the theater would be empty, I was
surprised to walk into the Saturday night late show and find it 80%
full.  Although it was dark in there, I didn't see anyone gagging,
vomiting, falling asleep, or stalking out in disgust.
The reviews prepared me for an unending sequence of slow motion
footage.  Surprise!  The scene where he grabs the boy's letter is the
only one that comes to mind.  There may have been others; this one
sticks out only because it was supposed to be so insufferable. 
Especially since this scene has significance to the end of the movie, I
don't see the problem in emphasizing it.  It would also make great
trailer material.
And what's all this I hear about the lousy pacing?  I think too many
reviewers have seen so many fast paced action adventures that they have
no appreciation for a movie that takes its time telling a story. 
Everything fits together quite well.
For example, the surreal touches.  The sounds and images at the '76
station.  The freed zoo lion as the Postman, aimlessly wandering the
wastelands.  The ending of the movie is cleverly foreshadowed in the
scene where the Holnist follows the trail of blood into a thicket,
expecting to find a cowering, helpless victim.  Instead, he finds the
lion, now fierce and dangerous.
Another example is the much derided time Abby and the Postman spend in
the woods.  This is essential to the Postman's development.  She makes
the hard choices, like butchering the horse, so they can survive.  He
claims to be helpless.  He remains immobile until, in an emergency, he
discovers that he can get up and help.  The whole movie is about a
populace that thinks it is helpless, but discovers that it can get up
onto its feet.
We tend to like our heroes to be strong, intelligent, capable, and
larger than life.  The thing that must irritate a lot of reviewers is
that the movie goes to great lenghts to make it clear that the Postman
is not particularly smart, adept, or ambitious.  He's not a very
convincing con-man.  He's even a lousy Shakespearian actor.  If left to
himself (and his cabin were not torched), he would be content to sit on
his backside for a long time.  The point of the movie is that common
folks have it within themselves to do uncommon things.
Although The Postman has been criticized as too long, my gripe is that
it wasn't long enough.  It urgently needs more footage of the final
confrontation.  I enjoyed the reference to Dances With Wolves when the
Postman rides his horse across the enemy's battle lines; however, after
all the audience has been through, the battle is bit of an anticlimax. 
The struggle could have been longer, more personal, and more intense.
Perhaps it is just that my expectations going in were so low.  For
whatever, reason, I found The Postman far more enjoyable than I was
prepared for.  To echo the sentiments of a previous posting, see it
yourself and decide.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
Once again, Kevin Costner spends far too much time, money and
seriousness on a slim tale. He plays an itinerant actor who reluctantly
becomes a symbol of freedom. But then, everyone thinks they're an actor
in this film.
"The Postman" (or, as it is called on the arthouse circuit, "Ill
Postino") was a project with "deadmeat" engraved across its forehead
even before it left the studio. A po-faced film of epic intent, helmed
by an actor everyone seems to love to hate, it is a worthy successor to
"Waterworld". But is it really as bad as all that? Sort of.
This is how it is. Kevin Costner is a scavenger, wandering the deserts
of a post-comfy era. And not for the last time, you think about how far
we have fallen where a world-famous actor is called "Kevin". But anyway,
the Kevster finds an abandoned garage and lounges there for a while,
talking to himself. "Things I like about my ass," he muses. But he's not
talking about the famed Costner tush (which obviously was holding out
for a more challenging role) but the mule that is our hero's only
friend.
Kev drags his ass down to a local town. It is revealed that he earns his
living moving from grungy town set to grungy town set, doing Shakespeare
for the locals. (Of course, there's only one of him, so he has to stick
his ass on stage.) But just after Kev has finished acting with his ass,
the bad guys ride into town for a bit of casual terrorism and extortion.
Kev tries to sneak his ass out of town, but the army spots his ass.
Conscripted into the army, Kev is imprisoned and can only stare
longingly at his ass.  He suffers as the army whips his ass. If only he
could get free, he could save his ass. Then the sadistic army commander
serves the recruits mule for supper. And so it is that everyone gets to
have a piece of Kevin's ass. Enraged, Kev escapes and wanders into the
desolate badlands. Travel is slow, for he has no ass.
The opportunity for ass jokes having passed, the movie gets a lot duller
after this point. And the story hasn't even started, with the hour mark
looming on the horizon and as yet no mention of the eponymous postal
employee. Actually, when the original David Brin story was written,
perhaps postmen could be regarded as symbols of a smoothly running and
civil society. Today of course, they represent something different - ill
controlled homicidal rage and the need for tighter gun control. So who
better to take back a country from its oppressors?
Suffice it to say, Kev-baby eventually dons the uniform of a dead postie
and thus bluffs his way into a suspicious independent settlement. There
he is greeted as a symbol of hope and incidentally gets to have a medium
level sex scene. The remainder of the picture (and there's an awfully
big remainder) concerns how this brings hope back to the people of the
USA, while simultaneously sapping it from the audience. It's not
unwatchable, but it is the sort of film you follow out of the corner of
your eye while reading mail, doing the dishes, playing pinochle or - in
fact - doing anything else.
I'm now going to attempt to rescue some message from this mess. "The
Postman" is awful but it is certainly not much worse than a lot of films
that do respectable box-office. It has a strong female lead, an
ambiguous hero and the central story is small enough and cute enough to
make a good film. So how did it go wrong, and why is it so reviled? I
can only shrug. Maybe someone should have stepped in over the complaints
of the auteurs and said "enough is enough." (Certainly that would have
had a positive effect on the recent output of George Lucas and James
Cameron.) Maybe the critics fed off each and condemned the picture
without a chance. (As happened with "Heavens Gate".) Perhaps the process
of making a Hollywood film is essentially stochastic, more a series of
accidents than good judgement.
I can only shrug again. [*/misfire] and revision for undergraduate
economics on the Sid & Nancy scale.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Kevin Costner's latest post-apocalyptic epic, THE POSTMAN, asks
the rhetorical question: Is a bad, two hour movie made better by
expanding it to three?
     Pretentious with a capital P, Costner's POSTAL WATERWORLD delivers
such cinematic balderdash that it becomes laughably bad at points.
Perhaps with the fat pruned, say an hour and a half or so, the movie
could be viewed as a delightful parody of the genre, but as delivered,
its pomposity makes laughing at it seem somehow inappropriate, sort of
like laughing in church when the priest gets tongue-tied.
     "The last of the great cities died when my father was a child,"
says the Postman's daughter in the opening.  Costner in his futuristic
Western is known only as The Postman.  Set in the year 2013, the
country formerly known as the United States consists of a series of
disconnected and derelict cities.  The government, once way back in
Washington, is no more, and acting as a feudal lord, General Bethlehem
(Will Patton) rules the land, extracting tribute from each hamlet that
his army visits.
     Like a religious order, the army has its commandments and its
rituals.  "Work, and you'll be fed," the general, a copy machine
salesman before the war, lectures his newly captured recruits.  "Fight,
and you'll be respected.  Die, and you'll be remembered."
     A bad Shakespearean actor and a loner, Costner becomes the Postman
after finding a bag of undelivered mail.  He travels from city to city
delivering the mail and making up stories about a non-existent, new
President Richard Starkey (sound familiar?), who now rules from the
Hubert Humphrey Astrodome in Minneapolis.
     With John Bloomfield's costumes making everyone look like
inhabitants of a lost Dickensian novel about the American West, you
feel like you should feel sorry for these people.  With James Newton
Howard's melodramatic music and Stephen F. Windon's sweeping
cinematography, you know you are supposed to.
     Typical of the ridiculous scenes in the movie is one that involves
a Shakespearean contest pitting a conscripted Costner against the
general.  In a world gone mad, the only intellectual left is the
megalomaniacal general, who demolishes our hero in the contest,
performed to the grunts and applause of the general's bloodthirsty
warriors.
     One of the best scenes in the movie -- best in the sense that it
is so preposterous that ridiculing it seems appropriate -- happens at
an outdoor movie.  As the animalistic soldiers get their evening
entertainment, the projectionist dares to run something other than
their favorite, THE SOUND OF MUSIC.  Their reaction is swift and
vicious as they try to stone him to death.
     The movie flouts realism at every turn.  When the Postman and his
companion, Abby (Olivia Williams), get stuck in a snow bound cabin for
the winter to feast on snow and grass, Amy's coiffure stays immaculate.
Somewhere in the cabin, Amy seems to have a hidden blow dryer and a
make-up bag.
     The story's ending, as rival armies of blue and gold take to the
field, combines elements of GETTYSBURG and HIGH NOON.  I won't give
away who wins, but if you can't figure it out, then you may be part of
just the target audience Costner's self-indulgent movie needs.
     If you're looking for a patriotic postal service movie for
Christmas, then this is your picture.  Otherwise, in a season with more
good movies that we've had all year, go see one of the many excellent
ones instead.
     THE POSTMAN runs an incredibly long 3:00.  It is rated PG-13 for
violence, sex, nudity and dope smoking and would be fine for teenagers.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Why is this movie three hours long? Because it's too stupid
to know when to stop.
THE POSTMAN may be the single dumbest movie I've ever seen. Not the
worst -- I still leave that accolade to be divided between STARSHIP
TROOPERS and MONEY TRAIN -- but by far the dumbest. It takes a
situation that had plenty of possibilities, which are all better
examined in the David Brin novel that THE POSTMAN has been sensessly
cannibalized from, and turns them into an idiot's delight. People
should be able to buy insulin along with their popcorn for this one,
it's so saccharine and treacly.
Not too far into the future, America has been ravaged by a war which
has shattered civilization. The exact details of this war are
conveniently omitted -- I imagine they felt "it wasn't important", or
some other such lame writer's left-handed excuse. Omitting critical
detail is not the same thing as creative restraint, and in this movie
they add up to glaring empty places in the story.
Wandering through the shattered landscape (snore) is a man with no
name (double snore) who comes across the uniform and truck of a dead
mailman. He's used to sleazing his way from one end of hell to the
other, so he puts on the uniform (hey, it's in pretty good shape for a
guy who's been dead at LEAST a decade!) and tries to scam whatever
little pockets of civilization are left into offering him shelter, by
pretending to be a letter carrier for the "Restored United States of
America".
We are supposed to believe that the movie is about how this drifted
inspires people by his "example". Wrong: the movie is not about
anything, because it's too busy drowning in jackass cliches and
godawful writing to ever manage a Statement of Purpose. It's one part
Western, one part MAD MAX and one part Hollywood self-congratulatory
sentimentalism, none of which works. It's also an ass- (and bladder-)
breaking three hours. TITANIC, in comparison, felt half as long
because it was so watchable and so swift on its feet. THE POSTMAN is a
lumbering, boneheaded wreck of a movie that doens't know when to lie
down and give up.
The silliness is just unstoppable. One painfully unfunny scene has
Costner's character trying to do Shakespeare from memory (and we
learn, over and over and over again, that he can't do it without cue
cards). Another one has him doing his letter-carrying rounds on
horseback, shot in such agonizing slow motion that we want to shout
instructions at the projectionist. Maybe when this is released on tape
and in a deluxe CAV letterboxed collector's edition laserdisc set (as
it inevitably will be), we can thumb the fast-forward and make up for
Costner's hamhandedness in the director's chair.
Monty Python once had a recurring character they named D.P. Gumby, an
utter dimwit who approached everything from brain surgery to flower
arranging with granite-jawed seriousness. Watching THE POSTMAN, I felt
many associations could be drawn between Mr. Gumby and Kevin Costner
as a filmmaker. Costner is just so ploddingly, heart-rendingly,
goddamned *earnest* in this movie -- both as an actor and as the
creative mind behind it -- that he fails to notice he's making a
complete and utter fool of himself.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
When you say the words "Frank Capra" and "Christmas movie", most of us
are hard-wired or one response:  It's a Wonderful Life.  But there is
another Frank Capra Christmas movie that gets overlooked as a result;
Meet John Doe, starring Gary Cooper.
Cooper plays a down-on-his-luck baseball pitcher, suffering through the
Great Depression.  A newspaper reporter, who has fabricated a populist
political column under the name of John Doe, hires Cooper to play the
part.  Cooper ends up doing too good of an acting job, and finds himself
at the head of a political movement -- which is soon sabotaged by rich
and powerful forces.
I mention the movie partly because I really like it and recommend that
you rent it, but mostly because Kevin Costner has remade it, and called
it The Postman.
There are lots of bad things about The Postman:  enough bad things that
you could argue that it deserved every bad review it got -- and it got
plenty.  However, I'll confess that I enjoyed The Postman, not for what
it is, necessarily, but for the sake of what it tries to be.  Costner --
who directs, produces, and stars -- may have created an overlong vanity
picture, but at least it's a well-intentioned overlong vanity picture,
and that's worth a good review.
The Postman's premise is that some nameless calamity has destroyed the
cities, leaving the plague-infested population to cluster in small
towns.  The only political power is the power of the Rod and the Axe,
wielded by a group of paramilitary white separatists led by General
Bethlehem (Will Patton).  (The group is called the "Holmists", and a
misunderstanding had me scratching my head through the first half of the
movie -- why are they calling themselves "the homeless"?)  Itinerant
actor Costner is captured by Bethlehem's band of raiders, and is
indoctrinated in their merciless political philosophy.
Costner manages to escape Bethlehem's rag-tag army, but has the bad luck
to do so during a snowstorm.  He finds shelter in an abandoned postal
truck, and once morning comes, he appropriates the uniform and letters
he finds inside, seeking to trade them for food.
What happens next is straight out of Meet John Doe:  he starts telling
lies for food.  Costner tells the impoverished and news-starved Oregon
small-town residents that he's a postman, a representative of the newly
restored government, and that a new President and Congress have been
elected.  Just as in Meet John Doe, the lies are believed
enthusiastically.  And just as the hope-starved Depression populace in
Capra's fable starts a string of "John Doe Clubs", the restless
teenagers of the post-apocalypse start their own postal routes, in
imitation of their legendary hero, The Postman.  It's at this point that
the narrative starts to go all to pieces, and the movie disintegrates
into a predictable contest of good versus evil.  But there are a few
good moments, where an utterly dumbfounded Costner tries to address his
troops, and where he tries to keep them from saluting him all the
time.
Costner is a fine actor, combining Gary Cooper rectitude with Jimmy
Stewart charm -- and he needs every atom of talent he possesses to help
dig The Postman out of the ditch.  He's a much better cinematographer
than a director, though.  Just as in Dances With Wolves, the scenery is
diverse and fantastic, but the interactions between characters are weak
at times.  Patton, sporting a Civil War general's beard, is blustery and
good as the murderously efficient General Bethlehem.
As for the rest of the movie -- well, it's a mess.  The other characters
aren't well written, and the performances are uninspired.  There are a
couple of scenes that have absolutely no purpose whatsoever than to make
Costner look like a hero -- and for some reason, these scenes include
Costner friends (Tom Petty, in a cameo) or family (two of the Costner
children find roles.)  And where the no-way-out ending of Meet John Doe
was touching and romantic, the ending of The Postman is as bad as it can
be.
I'm not a fan of movies ripping off other movies.  I think it's a
mistake for Hollywood to spend more time on overbudgeted ripoffs like
The Jackal or Blues Brothers 2000 while making it difficult for original
films like The Apostle or Good WIll Hunting or As Good As It Gets.  But
if you're going to rip off another movie, I think you at least ought to
pick a movie that's worthy of the homage.  The Postman is at least
ripping off one of my favorite movies, and I've got to give Costner
credit for that.  (But be sure to rent Meet John Doe, OK?)
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"There's one thing that is forbidden on journeys by sled,
and that is whimpering.  Whining is a virus, a lethal,
infectious epidemic disease.  I refuse to listen to it."
  --  Peter Hoeg, "Smilla's Sense of Snow"

Author
Michael Dequina
THE POSTMAN (Warner Bros.) 
Starring: Kevin Costner, Will Patton, Larenz Tate, and Olivia Williams. 
Screenplay: Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland, based on the novel by David Brin. 
Producers: Jim Wilson, Kevin Costner, and Steve Tisch. 
Director: Kevin Costner. 
MPAA Rating: R (violence, profanity, nudity, sexual situations) 
Running Time: 170 minutes.
Reviewed by Michael Dequina.
Rating: no stars out of **** (awful)
Even though the $180 million 1995 sci-fi adventure WATERWORLD was
dismissed by critics and audiences alike, producer/star/11th-hour
"director" Kevin Costner managed to emerge from the wreckage unscathed,
with most of the blame and discredit going to the film's true helmer, Kevin
Reynolds.  Costner won't be getting away so easily this time--his new
sci-fi epic, THE POSTMAN, is even more disastrous, and no one is to blame
but Costner himself, who also directed.
Granted, a little slack must be cut for THE POSTMAN, which comes to the
theatres with three strikes against it.  First of all, it is Costner's
first directorial effort since his popular, Oscar-winning 1990 debut,
DANCES WITH WOLVES.  Second, the film's title is also associated with a
dearly beloved recent film, the excellent 1995 Italian import IL POSTINO.
Third, the film's postapocalyptic setting is more than a little similar to
that of WATERWORLD--and that's not exactly a film audiences want to be
reminded of, to say the least.
But Costner, is, after all, an Academy Award-winning director, and one
would think he could come up with something decent--or, at the very least,
coherent.  But even the modest hopes of the latter are dashed almost
immediately with the expository opening narration, which apparently
explains the second American Civil War that led to the country's demise.  I
say "apparently" because I could not make sense of any of it--exactly what
happened and how it led to America becoming a wasteland in the year 2013.
It would help if Costner or screenwriters Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland
(working from the novel by David Brin) threw in more expository dialogue
along the way to clarify things.  No such luck.  Once the narration ends,
pity the poor viewer who could not digest it... which is just about everyone.
Shortly after that, we are introduced to Costner's nameless drifter, who,
about an hour into this ridiculously long (170 minutes) film, lends the
film its name.  After escaping a military training camp held by the evil
General Bethlehem (Will Patton, who is actually quite good), who rules the
anarchic American Northwest with an iron fist, the drifter finds an
abandoned mail truck and enters a small Oregon town under the guise of a
postman.  All he wants is a couple nights worth of food and lodging, but in
pretending to be an official of "the restored United States of America," he
becomes the living embodiment of hope for the oppressed people.  Soon he
finds himself with numerous disciples who revivethe former grand American
tradition of... mail delivery, and, in turn, bringing to life the hopes of
a restored nation--which, of course, does not sit well with General Bethlehem.
I do not know what is more laughable--the barebones plot synopsis or its
actual execution.  The story is ridiculous, but it would have appeared at
the very least less so if Costner did not play everything with such a
straight face.  He is apparently trying to make a Profound Statement about
war and American society, but it is impossible to take anything seriously.
Consider the horrendous dialogue: for example, Roth and Helgeland's idea of
witty romantic repartee is having the Postman often say "You're really
weird!" to a young wife (Olivia Williams) who wants to bear his child.
Consider this most heavyhanded, idiotically symbolic plot development: the
woman bears the Postman's daughter, who is named--yes--Hope (get it???).
Most of all, consider the most ludicrously preachy moment of the film, this
most unintentionally hilarious scene that occurs near the end: The Postman
stops a follower from killing a man, saying, "There will only be peace!"
So far, not too bad, but then the masses of people surrounding him look at
each other, nod, and say, "Yeah."  The audience rolls in the aisles (that
is, provided they are still awake); the last trace of dramatic credibility
flies out the window.
The heart of THE POSTMAN's problems is the title character himself.  We
are supposed to be inspired by the Postman and the society he has
inadvertently created, but he is such an unsympathetic, self-serving
character that we never once believe that he could attract a single
follower, let alone hordes.  And the lies he concocts are so ludicrous, not
to mention poorly delivered, that it's a wonder how anyone believes any of
it.  He only seems to grasp the importance of his actions and influence
with about thirty minutes to go, but this "changed" Postman comes off as a
satirical, reverse stereotype of the American postal worker--one who
denounces all violence, urging everyone to live in peace.
Usually when I think a movie is bad, I at least concede that it may be
worth the while of loyal fans of the star or director.  Not so with THE
POSTMAN.  Die-hard Kevin Costner fans may find themselves changing their
mind after seeing this overlong, lumbering mess, a miserable failure in
just about every respect.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court:
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html
"If you chase something, then sometimes you never get it.
 If you put forth the work and all the attitude, next thing you know
 it's bestowed upon you."
--Michael Jordan

Author
David Sunga
Ingredients: 
Post-Apocalyptic world, lone man, beautiful woman, evil warlord 
Synopsis: 
It is the year 2013. The United States has been destroyed and is only a
legend. Civilization is reduced to shambles. All that is left are
pitiful isolated settlements in the American West and Northwest that pay
tribute to a tyrannical warlord named General Bethlehem (Will Patton).
Enter a traveling beggar named Shakespeare (Kevin Costner) who does
stage performances for food, but is usually unwelcome in the suspicious
towns. One day Shakespeare tells a grand lie. To get accepted into town
he tells the people at the gates that he is a postman representing the
restored government of the United States. To everyone's surprise, people
really believe in the restored United States, and this eventually leads
to a full scale revolt against evil General Bethlehem, with a reluctant
Shakespeare caught in the middle of the situation.
Opinion:
Costner seems comfortable and in his element here, as far as acting is
concerned. This movie seems part WATERWORLD and part DANCES WITH WOLVES,
because the time period is post-Apocalypse like WATERWORLD, yet the
story takes place in the vast Western wilderness like DANCES WITH
WOLVES. Eric Roth, the screenwriter of Forrest Gump co-wrote the script
to this movie so of course it features a gosh-darn humble American hero
with lots of apple pie and cavalry scenes and flag saluting, and
American values. THE POSTMAN tries to be a sweeping epic about a lone
wilderness guy perpetuating a Santa-Clause-type lie that revives a
fallen America. If you go for a lot of horse-riding and flag-waving,
you'll probably like the movie, though it might seem about 30 minutes
too long. However, If you're not into all that Americana stuff, you'll
find THE POSTMAN watchable, but a bit corny. The way to approach this
movie is to watch it as if it's a Saturday afternoon HERCULES adventure.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 By Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros./Tig Production
 Director:  Kevin Costner
 Writer:  Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland, book by David Brin
 Cast: Kevin Costner, Will Patton, Larenz Tate, Olivia
Williams, James Russo, Tom Petty
   "Strangers: do you say 'hi' or do you blow their heads off?"
queries the title character (Kevin Costner) well into his latest
long, epic movie. This rhetorical question is at the heart of this
sweeping odyssey, filmed smashingly in some of America's
most scenic, Pacific Northwest areas by cinematographer
Stephen Windom.  Based on a novel by David Brin, the
screenplay is loaded with conviction, taking the present
country--which the writers consider all too politically and
ethnically divided--into the year 2013, a land of strangers
living in isolated, fortress communities after a series of riots
and plagues has destroyed the government, the infrastructure,
the electrical systems, and just about everything that gives
meaning to its very name, the UNITED States.
   Genre-wise, "The Postman" is perhaps the oddest duck of
1997 crop of films, a pot-pourri of paradoxes.  It's possesses
a 21st-century sci-fi imagination but looks more like a 19th
Century, John-Wayne style Western.  Fifteen years have
elapsed since the present day, yet the surviving people look
as they they've come out of the Middle Ages.  The
government, such as it is, certainly does not bear out the
predictions of futurologists who think we are headed into a
world community united by intricate trade agreements and
political compromises.  Rather it has become a series of
feudal fiefdoms occasionally invaded by a warlord named
General Bethlehem (Will Patton).  Its hero is a solitary, rugged
individualist who is a staunch believer in community.  Like
"Titanic," which opened one week previous to this Costner-
dominated work, it's full of hokum, yet the cornball humor
seems meant to be taken at its word rather than as campy
buffoonery, and as such is likely to be derided by urbanites,
cynics and critics but embraced by Middle America.  In short,
"The Postman" is an original, an ideologically-driven movie
whose story line is a solidly conventional narrative, eclipsed
by an aw-shucks hero who is neither Superman nor Batman,
but, of all things, Postman.  If the United States Postal
Service had anything to do with its production, it has put over
one of the most extensive and vainglorious product
placements in cinema history.  Costner has done more to
glorify the position of mail carrier than anyone since Cliff
Claven (John Ratzenberger) of "Cheers" renown.
   The story opens on a solitary individual roaming a nearly
barren desert whose only conversations are with his burro
named Billy.  He's a peaceful sort, a would-be actor who at
one point entertains a small community of kids with some
badly performed monologues taken from Shakespeare which
delight his innocent, young audience as much as the duel he
fights with his four-legged friend.  Since the U.S. government
in Washington no longer exists and technology is kaput in this
post-apocalyptic land, a vacuum has been created, one which
is being filled by a marauding, crypto-fascist army under the
leadership of the merciless Bethlehem (Will Patton). 
Bethlehem, an out-and-out villain who fights not so much for
dominance as for the very love of skirmishes, adds men to his
rag-tag but vicious army by drafting unwilling members of the
towns he invades.  His big mistake is impressing the
Shakespearean actor into his service, a man who despite his
pacifism and love of the arts becomes his arch-enemy by
escaping from the well-guarded encampment, donning the
U.S. Post Office uniform of a deceased letter carrier he
comes across during his escape, and, discovering a sack of
undelivered mail, proceeds to deliver it to addressees in the
first community he encounters.
   We quickly become aware that this mail service, in the
absence of computers, becomes the principal hope of people
who have long been segregated into small locales and have
been unable to communicate with friends and relatives in
distant areas.  The Postman not only delivers during the
metaphoric gloom of night which has descended on the
country: he gives added faith to the people by fabricating
stories of a restored United States government under a
President Sharkey, with the capital city moved to Minneapolis. 
"The Postman" then turns into a road movie with a strong
romantic theme, as the title character is seduced by the
beautiful Abby (Olivia Williams) who without the slightest
timidity announces that she wants to be impregnated by him
since her husband is infertile.
   The team behind this movie, especially Costner who is
principal actor, director and co-producer, and the scripters,
Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland, envision a shattered nation
taken over by neo-Nazi gangs, making the point clear that
General Bethlehem--who is a mediocre painter with a
superficial knowledge of the liberal arts--has been modeled as
a 21st century Hitler, even to the point of tattooing his
unwilling conscripts.  With a bow to textbook psychology, the
movie shows us that some of the draftees become
enthusiastic members of the right-wing zealots, particularly
one slow-witted guy who insists, "I like it here...I want to
belong to something."  There is little attempt at subtlety in this
script: Costner seems to have a broad audience in mind when
he spells out every detail leaving little to metaphoric
speculation.  Even the baby who is born to The Postman and
his loving woman Abby is named Hope, showing the
importance of continuity as well as community if what remains
of the country is to be saved, to prosper, to re-unite.  The
statue of the Postman which is unveiled decades after his
passing can be dismissed by a hip audience as laughable, but
Costner's heart is in the right place and he seems perfectly
happy to throw in cloying message so that every last member
of his paying fans will get the central ideas.  
   Costner has the money to make the pictures he wants to
make, once again, as with "Dancing With Wolves," delivering
his purport with an expensive, sometimes ludicrous, but
always sincere and exquisitely photographed work.
Rated R.  Running Time: 177 minutes.  (C) 1997 Harvey
Karten

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     The plot has been done so many times in so many tiresome ways that
we really did not need one more. Society has been destroyed and
peaceful good guys of the world are menaced by marauding nasties.  Then
one hero (or perhaps a handful) stands up and saves the good guys.  It
is really SHANE turned into a science fiction film.  NO BLADE OF GRASS,
THE ROAD WARRIOR, WARRIORS OF THE WASTELAND, and any number of bad
sci-fi films on cable have used the plot because it does not require
fancy special effects to make a science fiction film.  Of course it can
still use up a big budget on the plot if the filmmaker wants.  Kevin
Costner's WATERWORLD is just one example.  Now Costner is back and,
surprise, it may be the best film on this theme ever made.  But it came
along too late and had a misleading trailer.  Had THE POSTMAN been made
in 1960--and except for having been based on a later novel it well
could have been--it might have been stiff competition for THE
MAGNIFICENT SEVEN.  But that was almost four decades ago.  Audiences
might have been more receptive to the film's idealism.  Today audiences
might be more cynical about the film's message of the power or idealism
and optimism.
     It should be noted that in spite of the impression given by the
trailer THE POSTMAN is not BACKDRAFT with mailmen.  The film is *not* a
tribute to the loyalty and service of letter carriers.  That would be a
cause whose banality would be second only to that of the importance of
good dental hygiene. The trailer gave audiences that impression, and as
such it may turn out to be the most disastrous movie trailer in cinema
history.  I saw this film at a Saturday matinee and there were four
people in the audience, three of which were my group.  This film is not
STAR WARS, but it is not that bad of a film either.  It is considerably
better than ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES.
     We never do find out exactly what the war was that destroyed
civilization.  There was ground fighting in the United States and there
was either a nuclear winter or something similar.  In any case, the
world of 2013 is little pockets of people trying to scratch out a
subsistence living.  Making that more difficult are "the Holnists," a
private army, raiding small settlements.  The leader of the Holnists is
the fascist General Bethlehem (played with nice savagery by Will
Patton).  Bethlehem spouts the self-reliance rhetoric of the right wing
taken to a sadistic extreme.  Kevin Costner plays a drifter, a sometime
Shakespeare player, who is conscripted into the Holnists, meeting their
admission criteria ("if you are between fifteen and fifty and of
suitable ethnic foundation...")  When the drifter finds the opportunity
he escapes.  On the run, he finds a post office jeep with a skeleton of
a postman inside.  He thinks up a scam to get some food. Putting on the
postman's uniform, he takes some letters to a small nearby community of
Pinetree, Oregon, to deliver.  He claims to be an official postman
appointed by the newly reformed government and they have a
responsibility to feed and house him while he performs his duty.  The
effect is totally unexpected. These are people desperately in need of
good news and a return to the world that they knew.  (There is an
amusing scene earlier demonstrating that even Bethlehem's army is tired
of all the violence in their lives and refuses to watch UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER on a movie screen when there is THE SOUND OF MUSIC to watch.)
The Postman is treated by the settlement as a romantic hero.  His false
story rekindles optimism.  Writing a letter for the postman to deliver
becomes a symbolic act signifying faith in the new government.
     With a government to help protect them, people are willing to
resist the Holnists.  This hope and optimism is something that
Bethlehem cannot allow ("morale is a dangerous thing"), but also cannot
stop. Two people are especially affected by the visit of the Postman.
One is Abby (Olivia Williams) who is looking for someone to impregnate
her.  Her husband is impotent and both have decided to find someone
virile to act as biological father, especially one who will not be
around much.  The Postman fills the bill. The other person affected is
a black teen who goes by the name Ford Lincoln Mercury (Larenz Tate).
He is so inspired by the Postman, he decides on the spot that he will
become a Postman also.
Playing another clean-cut hero, albeit an involuntary one, will not do
much for Costner's career even if this film does find an audience.
There is little in his role that Costner has not done many times
before. There probably is little in the role of the idealistic savior
that he could not do in his sleep.  Will Patton, on the other hand, is
spell-binding playing the self-indulgent and inflexible fascist leader
with total conviction.  He plays the part like some great but strange
Civil War general.  Olivia Williams is sharp and smart as Abby.  Most
of the cast are little known but good actors while a few of the
characters are a little too cloyingly polished and pretty for their
roles--specifically a child actor handing off a letter to a racing
Costner.  But generally Stephen F. Windon provides some terrific images
of Oregon and Utah.  James Newton Howard provides a stirring if not
greatly original score.
     This film covers thematic territory that has become too familiar
from too many lesser films.  And then it made the further mistake of
releasing to theaters a trailer that distorted the thrust of this film.
Get past those two problems and this is actually not too bad a story,
even at its three-hour length.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
When I first heard about THE POSTMAN, the whole idea seemed very laughable to
me. It's the future, the world has become a wasteland, and somehow, somewhere,
a postman appears and becomes the icon of hope. A postman? A *postman*?!?! I
thought to myself, "this must've been written by some underappreciated mailman
in Nebraska or something". As it surprisingly turned out, THE POSTMAN had more
to offer than I ever thought it would.
The plot *is* similar to what I said, but I'll rephrase for the sake of
decency. It *is* the future (the year 2013 to be exact), and due to three-year
winters, bizarre weather, war, riots, etc., the world population has seriously
dwindled, the American government no longer exists, and the earth resembes the
middle ages with machine guns. A nameless wanderer (Kevin Costner) traveling
in search of food and water, finds a small village in the middle of nowehere,
and decides it is the opportunity to charm his way to nourishment. Performing
his own unique brand of one-man (and a horse) Shakespeare, he obtains the pity
and food he needs.
Peachy keen? Not quite. General Bethlehem (Will Patton) is the leader of a
KKK-influenced army that pillages and plunders small towns like the pirates of
old. Yes, he even sports a nice beard. When his army arrives in the same small
town, he wants more than supplies and food. He demands that all "eligible"
males between the ages of 15 and 30 come forward. The plan is to turn each and
every "eligible" man into a fighting machine for Bethlehem's brigade. To be
considered "eligible", you can't just be fit, you can't have any black in you.
While our wanderer attempts to sneak away, he is spotted and forced to join
the clan. Along with a few townsmen, he is taken to Bethlehem's training camp
of sorts, where Bethlehem picks on him right away. After a battle of wits,
Bethlehem derogatorily nicknames the wanderer "Shakespeare", and "Shakespeare"
quickly becomes the "runt" of the group - he's the least avid to comply, the
least to condone violence, and the one Bethlehem wants to see run into the
ground. Naturally the movie wouldn't get too exciting if "Shakespeare" didn't
escape, and so he finally does.
"Shakespeare" travels alone thru the bitter cold and finally takes up shelter
in an old mail truck. Inside, he finds the skeletal remains of a postman, and
quickly strips off the clothes to keep himself warm. He finds a lighter and
starts his own makeshift fire out of old, undelivered letters. Curiousity gets
to "Shakespeare", and soon he finds himself reading some of these old letters.
An idea!
The next we see of "Shakespeare", he is entering another town, fully dressed
as a postman and carrying a bag of letters over his shoulder. Once again, in
an effort to obtain food and nothing more, he approaches the small city. With
an outrageous tale of a "restored congress", "Shakespeare" claims to be a
postman, just like before the world went to hell. Everybody rejoices at the
news that back east the government is being renewed. The fable works, and
quickly "the postman" finds himself being fed and bathed by the rejuvinated
town. But questions start to arise, and "the postman" finds himself deeper in
his own fabrication than he ever thought he'd be. "Is there a president?" one
townsperson asks. Hesitantly, the postman replies, "Um, yes . . . Richard
Starkey".
In this town, we meet a couple of central characters. One is the young black
man determined to make something of himself. Going by the name Ford Lincoln
Mercury (Larenz Tate), he is so determined to become a postman himself that
Costner's character eventually swears him with pseudo-authority. We also meet
Abby (Olivia Williams), a young wife whose husband can't conceive. She
approaches "the postman" in the hopes that he will impregnate her so she and
her husband can have a child. Will he do it?
It doesn't take long before Bethlehem hears of this allegiant revival. He
quickly considers "the postman"  a threat to his dictatorship. What beings is
a hunt down for "the postman", and a war between Bethlehem's army and those
who wish to believe in a restored United States. I was reminded of a mixture
between BRAVEHEART and WATERWORLD. In fact, one of Bethlehem's comments refers
to an issue that was a major factor in BRAVEHEART.
What THE POSTMAN is really about, is patriotism. We watch as young hope-filled
eyes suddenly take on an aspiring radiance. It's corny as hell if you really
look at it, but THE POSTMAN carries enough charm to likely win over a large
sentimental audience. It's also surprisingly funny, and Costner's character
was my favorite of all his characters I've seen. Patton was very cliched, and
a lot of the film was very melodramatic, especially when you realize that
you're supposed to be breaking down into tears over a postman. It's sappy and
far-fetched, but it's also enamoring.
Kevin Costner seems stuck on making long, wannabe-epic films. THE POSTMAN is
no exception. Nearly stretching to three hours, this film has a massive dose
of overkill. Trim it by as little as thirty minutes, and you could've had a
cute, albeit saccharine film. But the dopey premise is forgivable thanks to
the load of sweetness. Let's just be grateful we didn't wind up with THE
U.P.S. GUY instead.

Author
James Sanford
THE POSTMAN
(Warner Brothers)
 The postman doesn't deliver on Christmas Day, and "The Postman," Kevin
Costner's Christmas gift to America, doesn't deliver much in the way of
entertainment, regardless of what day it is. A bloated, overwrought telling
of a simple --and jaw-droppingly corny-- tale, this attempt at a sort of
sci-fi Western duplicates the thre-hour-plus length of Costner's directorial
debut "Dances With Wolves" (1990), without summoning up one iota of the
emotional power of the earlier film.
 Instead, "The Postman" is a textbook study of a director falling in love
with a truly bad idea and desperately struggling to turn it into a playable
movie. But despite giving a passable performance in front of the camera,
Costner is not quite a skilled enough director to elevate "The Postman" to
the epic status it so badly wants to claim.
 Adapted from David Brin's novel and set in 2013, following a second Civil
War, "The Postman" depicts life in an America in which the government has
fallen and a merciless warlord who calls himself General Bethlehem (Will
Patton) roams the land with his "racially pure" troops, terrorizing the
scattered settlements in the West, which seem --judging by the shabby
wardrobes on view-- to be populated exclusively by people who have forgotten
how to sew. When a nameless drifter (Costner) who has escaped Bethlehem's
army pretends to be a postman to get free meals and hospitality on the road,
his masquerade inadvertantly snowballs into a crusade against the General
and his men. The spirit of America is resurrected along with the mail
service, and, when he's not opposing tyranny, The Postman plays post office
with frontier babe Abby (Olivia Williams), who first begs him to impregnate
her and finally falls madly for him.
 If that all sounds more than a bit hokey, wait until you see how it plays
out. Although screenwriters Eric Roth and Brian Helgeland have made
ocassional stabs at trying to inject some humor into the proceedings, "The
Postman" is the most heavy-handed piece of jingoism since director John
Milius' 1984 camp classic "Red Dawn." Again and again Costner offers up
crowds of downtrodden souls who beam and look skyward as The Postman
delivers stirring speeches such as "Times seem tough right now, but suff's
gettin' better"; at one point, a little girl, inspired by this mail-carrying
messiah, bursts into a chorus of "America The Beautiful" and is quickly
joined by the throngs around her.
 Even worse is a scene that shows anxious townsfolk applauding The Postman
as he delivers the mail (no one seems to realize that with the postal
service restored they'll son be receiving 15 years worth of overdue bills)
and a laughably drawn-out vignette in which a little boy hands off a letter
to The Postman as he gallops by on horseback. Director Costner shows a
decided weakness for slow-motion, both in the action sequences and in the
would-be tearjerking portions of the film, and the technique doesn't always
enhance the scene.
 It should also come as no surprise that "The Postman" features a virtual
gallery of Costner close-ups, all elegantly lensed by cinematographer
Stephen Windon, whose camerawork is one of the picture's major strengths:
here's Kevin by moonlight; Kevin through frosted glass; Kevin in mountain
stream. Next to this, Barbra Streisand's "The Mirror Has Two Faces" looks
like the work of a wallflower.
 Obviously Costner believes in this material and wants to share the
qualities he sees in it with the masses. But "The Postman" collapses under
the weight of its own preachiness and ponderousness. Treat it as you would a
rancid fruitcake delivered by mail: Mark it "return to sender" and stay as
far away from it as possible.
James Sanford

Author
Tim Voon
I don't understand Kevin Costner's fetish for legendary, bigger than
life heroes. We look at his work DANCES WITH WOLVES where ordinary
soldier becomes legendary Indian liaison officer. In PRINCE OF THIEVES
he is a legendary social worker. In WYATT EARP, a legendary police
officer and WATERWORLD is no exception with a legendary mutant. So it's
not surprising that a picture titled THE POSTMAN starring Kevin Costner,
will be about a legendary postman. Sorry Kevin, but I'm getting tired of
all this legendary stuff. I just like my mail delivered without much ado
legendary fuss.
Costner who directs this movie, has tried to recreate an epic as big as
the American Civil War in the future. He fails miserably especially when
he tries to draw on that all American patriotic spirit, by burning a
couple of US flags and getting one of his kids to sing the national
anthem. This doesn't draw much of an emotional response, especially if
you're foreign and carry little American sentiment. Still it is
difficult to believe that in the year 2012, 14 years from now, one will
be faced with a post-apocalyptic way of life. Chaos runs amuck. The
survivors of this 3rd WW holocaust now live in small towns isolated from
each other. Evil shows itself in the form of a Hitler like General with
an organised army of mercenaries. A man rises against the General's
totalitarian rule, the legendary POSTMAN.
The problem seems to arise from overcrowding the story with too many
events. This results in a patchy story line with garish errors. An
example is what I call the re-instillation of the ten commandments
scene. Rule number 1: No more killing', the postman yells aloud, and
this is followed by Rule number 8: Live and Let live'. Hello, but isn't
rule number 1 the same as rule number 8 and what about rules 2 to 7? The
middle of the movie is filled with the recreation of The Pony Express',
before a North meets South ending where the geriatric/adolescent army
confronts the mercenaries. There is no great finale, just a fist fight
showing who is the better man. If I wanted a history lesson I could have
gone to the public library, and if this is the way that legends are
made, I'd rather not.
My final comments are severe. THE POSTMAN is unoriginal, poorly written
and unimaginative. An over all waste of precious time and money.

Author
Michael Redman
THE POSTMAN DELIVERS BUT NOT FIRST CLASS
[Warning: My opinion of this film is definitely in the minority of reviewers
perhaps because it hits so many of my cinematic buttons: post-apocalypse
stories, hope in a desperate situation, grassroots uprisings and Kevin
Costner. Even worse, I thought that "Waterworld" was watchable. Read the
following with those particular grains of salt.]
It's the year 2013 and things have fallen apart. Due to a world war in the
late nineties, the resulting three-year winter and a devastating plague, life
in the former United States has been reduced to isolated primitive fiefdoms. 
Although this is the future, it looks like a western. As the film opens, Kevin
Costner (his character's name is never revealed) is wandering the Utah
wastelands with only his mule Bill for company.
Giving extraordinarily bad Shakespearean performances in exchange for food and
lodging, Costner is an outsider in a land of outsiders. Running into even
worse luck, he is forcibly conscripted into the racially pure Holnist army of
General Bethlehem (Will Patton). The rag-tag retro-futuristic cavalry is the
descendent of militia groups and is even called the "clan"
After a brutal boot camp, he (and you can see this coming a mile away)
escapes. Taking shelter in a wrecked Postal truck, he liberates the uniform
and mail bag from the skeleton in the cab who no longer has a use for either.
Once he reaches Oregon, land of beautiful women, bright youngsters and rock
and roll; he pretends to be a representative from the "Restored Congress Of
The United States of America".
This scam gets him inside the walled towns where the promise of mail delivery
renews optimism in the hearts of the inhabitants. Food and other opportunities
come his way in the form of spirited Abby (Olivia Williams) who wants him to
father a child because her husband is sterile. Shortly her husband is killed
by Bethlehem and she and The Postman (as Costner is referred to for the rest
of the film) become a reluctant item.
Although The Postman knows he's running a fraud, the concept of renewed
communications sets the kids' imagination afire (especially Ford Lincoln
Mercury (Larenz Tate), his second-in-command) and they form a new Pony Express
dedicated to getting the mail through. The revived Postal Service doubles as
an army to fight the Holnists' tyranny. The Postman has become a symbol for
hope in a Rube Goldberg manner.
Although the movie appeals to my sensibilities, there are so many things wrong
with it that they can hardly be counted. It's derivitive of Costner's own
"Waterworld" and Clint Eastwood westerns. There's little here that we haven't
seen dozens of times before.
The film is often down-right corny. A scene where The Postman is on horseback
and grabs a letter from the hands of a bright-eyed child is embarrassing in
its slow-motion banality. The film's final few minutes should have been left
on the cutting room floor.
Despite the film's excessive three hour length, several things are never
explained. What was the war about? How did civilization change so rapidly?
Everyone has horses: where did all they come from? The "Law Of Eights" that
Bethlehem lives by seems to have its origins somewhere beyond the film, but
where? Are we to believe that the rest of the world is in the same shape and
hasn't made their way west to help or conquer?
There is some jumbled symbolism here that doesn't appear to make sense. The
tale is obviously saying that communication can defeat evil in much the same
way that the internet has the potential to topple governments, but beyond that
there are some oddities. 
The evil army is called "Holnists" which sounds coincidentally like the New
Age "Holism", but why? Is it another coincidence that it takes place in 2013,
just one year after many ancient prophesies (including the ending of the Mayan
calendar) predict a new world for mankind? Why is the general named
"Bethlehem"? There seems to be some reason for that, but what?
Sometimes the movie feels like a joke. An army of Postal workers armed with
guns? Considering the headlines of recent years, it takes a tremendous leap of
faith to cheer for these guys. 
It's even more difficult to accept those re-powering the federal government as
the heroes. Given the current climate of the country and the distrust of big
government, it's asking a lot for the audience to get behind the film's nationalism.
Even with its numerous flaws,  the movie all comes together, if only for those
who have the same weaknesses that I have. It's doubtful that "The Postman" is
going to find much of an audience, but a few of us are going to have a good
time. Besides we're all awaiting the fall of civilization caused by the Year
2000 millennium computer bug.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and would like to
announce that the "Michael Redman" arrested near Indianapolis last week for
accepting an illicit package from Federal Express is, to the best of his
knowledge, not him. Perhaps this similarly-named person should have used Kevin
Costner's Postal Service.)
[This appeared in the 12/30/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Christian Pyle
When I first heard that Kevin Costner was making a movie called "The Postman,"
I thought, "An American version of 'Il Postino?'  Starring Costner?  God help
us!"  When I found out that it was not a remake of "Postino" but an
postapocalyptic epic, I thought, "'Landworld?'  Please, God, make him stop!"
As it turns out, "The Postman" is a much better film than I had expected. 
Despite being set in 2013, the movie is, at heart, a western:  a band of thugs
terrorizes peaceful villagers; a wandering hero opposes the bandits and
inspires others to fight back.  The setting, however, allows that familiar plot
to take on greater significance:  American society has collapsed due to plagues
and wars, and survivors live behind barracades in isolated villages.  The
struggle of a dead society to be reborn has a grand quality and deserves the
epic scale Costner grants it.
Costner's nameless character, a wandering actor, rides in from the vast
wasteland and is soon shanghaied into the service of General Bethlehem (Will
Patton), a former copy-machine salesman turned bandit king.  Our hero escapes
and discovers the body of a dead postman.  Taking the uniform and bag of mail,
he passes himself off as a representative of "the Restored United States."  He
is shocked at the hope that he inspires in the people he meets.  One young
disciple, Ford Lincoln Mercury (Larenz Tate), organizes a full-scale postal
service.  Ford spreads The Postman's message of hope until Bethlehem finds that
the once-meek villagers are beginning to resist his rule.  As war breaks out
between Bethlehem's army and the postal workers, Costner's character steps into
the legend he created and goes from self-centered loner to leader of the
revolution.  His lie of the Restored United States becomes a self-fulfilling
prophecy.
"Postman" is an odd blend of a bleak setting and a message of wide-eyed
optimism (sort of "Sergio Leone meets Frank Capra"), but its treatment of hope
and renewal is compelling.  What could have been another knock-off of "The Road
Warrior" (like "Waterworld" was) surprises the viewer with a sensitively told
story of nobility emerging from rubble.
Tate is the stand-out in the movie's large cast.  Ford Lincoln Mercury
(self-named) is the polar opposite of O-Dog, Tate's character in his debut
film, "Menace II Society" (1993), and Tate makes Ford's innocent belief in hope
as convincing as O-Dog's cynicism and brutality.  His performance sells the
movie.  Interestingly, as Tate moves from his usual street-smart roles to
youthful optimism, the soft-eyed Patton, who usually plays nice guys, proves a
disarming villain.
Olivia Williams makes her film debut as The Postman's love interest, Abby. 
When they first meet, Abby asks him to father her child because her husband is
sterile.  Predictably, the husband is soon eliminated by the bandits, and Abby
is thrown back into the company of the hero.  However, their relationship
develops slowly as the emotional conflicts of both characters are explored
(she, torn by grief, guilt, and anger; he, resisting his destiny).
"The Postman" is Costner's best work thus far.  Perhaps that alone gives us
hope for the future . . . 

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     THE POSTMAN is pretty bad.  Kevin Costner produces, directs, and
stars in this ponderous, preposterous post-apocalyptic epic about an
actor who dons a blue uniform as a trick to get food.  He spins a yarn
about a restored U.S. government, which inspires others to hit the sack,
which, in turn, unites several previously disconnected Pacific Northwest
communities.  The core story, here, is a good one, but the narrative too
often zigs when it should zag.  Costner indulges himself in such dopey
detours as an extended love scene, when the screen time could be better-
used elsewhere.  (Perhaps to explain the relationship between the bad
guys-- an organized army of bandits-- and the various barricaded towns
that they terrorize?) The grand vistas and hundreds of extras are some-
thing to see, I guess, even if the tone is too thick and the story makes
increasingly less sense as it goes.  (In particular, the time frame is a
tough sell.  Less than nine months for all this sweeping stuff to occur?
And did you catch the hero's pregnant girlfriend lamenting her late hus-
band as the "best man she'd ever known" and only an hour earlier
describing how he beat her?  Good grief.)  Maybe if Mr. Costner paid
more attention to the trees, he'd have a forest worth seeing.  Maybe.
Return to sender.
